Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:PART IINTENTNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 101. (1) The legislature declares there is a state of emergency in scientific research activities conducted by Washington research institutions that is jeopardizing current research and the sustainability of scientific advancements for at least a generation, which in turn jeopardizes advances in human health and the economic prosperity of Washington residents.(2) The emergency has been caused by federal agencies acting at the direction of the incumbent President of the United States and in contravention of Congressional legislation and the longstanding commitment of the United States to being the world's leader in advancing human health, technological development, and economic expansion driven by research and development.(3) For more than half a century, through the financial support of governmental agencies including, but not limited to, the national science foundation, the national institutes of health, the department of energy, the United States food and drug administration, the federal centers for disease control and prevention, the national oceanic and atmospheric administration, and the department of war, the scientific and health communities have been able to create life-enhancing scientific, biomedical, and public health discoveries and technological advances that enhance national security and create economic prosperity.(4) At the direction of the presidential administration, those agencies have made changes that have resulted in drastic cuts to existing federal grants to research activities in Washington. The cuts have created an existential crisis in ongoing research activity. The cuts also preclude planning for future research because the cuts create uncertainty as to whether there will be sufficient funding to sustain the long timeline for experimentation and innovation needed to yield the benefits that so dramatically improve the lives of Washington citizens and beyond.(5) Washington's public research universities and colleges have lost or are projected to lose many hundreds of millions of dollars in federal research grant funding for fiscal year 2025 and many hundreds of millions of dollars more in the following year.(6) Ongoing research in Washington has been jeopardized in many fields including, but not limited to:(a) Medicine, such as breast and prostate cancer prevention and treatment research;(b) Agriculture and veterinary medicine, such as large animal research and animal-to-human disease transmission;(c) Climate and weather research;(d) Technological development, vital to security and economic development, such as quantum information science and engineering and semiconductor technology;(e) Small business innovation research and technology transfer; and(f) Applied physics research, key to our national defense.(7) Not only will lives be lost because of the failure to fund ongoing research, but many Washington research institutions will eliminate research programs because gaps in funding created by the planned federal cuts cannot be filled with other funding and make the ongoing research unsustainable. For just one example, Washington State University's college of veterinary medicine's research is 30 percent funded by the national institutes of health. The announced cuts put in jeopardy the continued work of the college of veterinary medicine's Washington animal disease diagnostic laboratory, the only accredited veterinary medical laboratory within Washington. The laboratory's work to detect, research, and conduct responses to current and future disease outbreaks such as the current highly pathogenic avian influenza (HPAI) virus, rabies, tularemia, and the plague may be lost completely.(8) The current announced cuts, and the uncertainty about future funding, have caused many research projects to cease and many more will cease or move to other countries where research funding is more sustainable. Washington will not only lose its current research capacity but will likely also lose a whole generation of scientists across a broad spectrum of research.(9) In addition to the damage to human health, the economic consequences of the loss of Washington's currently robust research activities will create a spiraling economic downturn in the state. Currently, research-driven innovation returns to Washington's economy more than two dollars for every dollar invested. For just one example, the University of Washington's research enterprise for fiscal year 2023 contributed $2,600,000,000 to the Washington state economy and supported 10,641 jobs.(10) The human and economic damage that is being caused and will be caused by the actions of the current federal executive administration can be mitigated by legislative action, approved by the people of Washington, to sustain ongoing and future scientific research. The health, economic welfare, and security of the people of Washington and our nation require the legislature and people to act to sustain research and innovation.PART IIBOND AUTHORIZATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 201. A new section is added to chapter 43.100A RCW to read as follows:(1)The state finance committee may issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of $6,000,000,000, or so much thereof as may be required, solely for the purpose of providing funds to advance scientific research, as specified in section 401 of this act, and all costs incidental thereto.(2) Bonds authorized in this section may be sold in the manner, at the time or times, in amounts, and at such price as the state finance committee determines.(3) The total amount of the bonds authorized by this section issued in any single calendar year, commencing in 2027, may not exceed $1,000,000,000. If less than this amount of bonds is issued in any year, the remaining permitted amount may be carried over to one or more subsequent years.(4) The authorization to issue bonds contained in this act does not expire until the full authorization has been issued.(5) No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 202. A new section is added to chapter 43.100A RCW to read as follows:It is the intent of the legislature that the proceeds of the new bonds authorized in sections 201 and 203 of this act will be appropriated for the specific uses set forth in section 403 of this act in phases over three biennia, beginning with the 2025â2027 biennium. This is not intended to limit the legislature's ability to appropriate bond proceeds if the full amount authorized in sections 201 and 203 of this act has not been appropriated after two biennia.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 203. A new section is added to chapter 43.100A RCW to read as follows:(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act must be deposited in the Washington institute for scientific advancement account created in section 301 of this act. If the state finance committee deems it necessary to issue the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act as taxable bonds in order to comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such taxable bonds must be deposited into the Washington institute for scientific advancement taxable bond account created in section 302 of this act. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the director of financial management if it is determined that any such transfer to the Washington institute for scientific advancement taxable bond account is necessary. If such a transfer is required, a portion of the appropriation authority granted in any omnibus capital appropriations act from the Washington institute for scientific advancement account is transferred to the Washington institute for scientific advancement taxable bond account in an amount equal to the transferred proceeds. For purposes of this section, "nontaxable bond proceeds" includes proceeds from bonds issued as tax exempt bonds and proceeds from taxable bonds eligible for direct federal subsidy or other federal tax advantage under the federal internal revenue code and internal revenue service rules.(2) The proceeds must be used exclusively for the purpose stated in section 403 of this act and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 204. A new section is added to chapter 43.100A RCW to read as follows:(1) The nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in sections 201 and 203 of this act.(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing 12 months to meet the bond retirement and interest requirements. On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due, the state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state treasury and deposit in the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the payment date.(3) Bonds issued under sections 201 and 203 of this act must state that they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as the same becomes due.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 205. A new section is added to chapter 43.100A RCW to read as follows:(1) The bonds authorized by sections 201 and 203 of this act constitute a legal investment for all state funds or for funds under state control and all funds of municipal corporations.(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 206. A new section is added to chapter 43.100A RCW to read as follows:The legislature may provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in sections 201 and 203 of this act, and sections 203 and 204 of this act do not provide an exclusive method for the payment.PART IIIACCOUNTSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 301. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:The Washington institute for scientific advancement account is created in the state treasury. Proceeds from the bonds issued under section 201 of this act must be deposited in the account. The account must be used for the purpose stated in section 403 of this act and for payment of expenses incurred in connection with the sale and issuance of the bonds. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 302. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:The Washington institute for scientific advancement taxable account is created in the state treasury. Proceeds from any taxable bonds issued and directed to the account under section 203 of this act must be deposited in the account. The account must be used for the purpose stated in section 403 of this act and for payment of expenses incurred in connection with the sale and issuance of the bonds. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.PART IVCREATION OF WASHINGTON INSTITUTE FOR SCIENTIFIC ADVANCEMENT, PROGRAM REQUIREMENTSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 401. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:To preserve and advance scientific achievement and to enhance the health and living standards of Washington residents, the Washington institute for scientific advancement is created within the department of commerce.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 402. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 42.30.110 and sections 401 through 412 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the Washington institute for scientific advancement.(2) "Council" means the Washington institute for scientific advancement research council.(3) "Indirect costs" means costs that benefit more than one activity of the recipient and are not directly assigned to a particular project objective.(4) "Institute" means the Washington institute for scientific advancement.(5) "Institute account" means the accounts established by sections 301 and 302 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 403. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this purpose, the institute shall establish a competitive process to solicit and evaluate applications for scientific research and related indirect costs. The institute shall facilitate scientific research by awarding grants to public or private research companies, universities, institutes, and organizations for scientific research, development, and the construction of facilities for research and development including, but not limited to, any of the following fields:(a)Â Biomedical, including finding cures for high mortality diseases including, but not limited to, cancer, Alzheimer's disease, heart disease, strokes, child and adult leukemia, infectious diseases, and HIV/AIDS;(b)Â Detecting and responding to new and emerging health threats;(c)Â Disease prevention, including, but not limited to, cancer, Alzheimer's disease, heart disease, strokes, child and adult leukemia, infectious diseases, and HIV/AIDS;(d)Â Promoting healthy and safe behaviors, communities, and environment;(e)Â Wildfire prevention;(f)Â Addiction and substance use;(g)Â Behavioral;(h)Â Climate, including climate change and its impact on human health;(i)Â Weather;(j)Â Ocean;(k)Â Coastal and marine ecosystems and resources;(l)Â Emerging technologies; and(m)Â Safety, efficacy, and security of drugs, biological products, medical devices, our nation's food supply, and cosmetics.(2) All grants provided under this section must be awarded or made available to researchers or projects located within this state, except that funding for research collaboratives between Washington and out-of-state researchers is permitted.(3) All projects funded by the institute must be conducted under established standards of open scientific exchange, peer review, and public oversight.(4) All grants provided under this section must be awarded based on both of the following:(a) The basis of the scientific research priorities established for the institute by the institute; and(b) The scientific merit of the proposal, as determined by an open, competitive, scientific peer review process that ensures objectivity, consistency, and high quality, for the bodies of research described in this section.(5) The institute must prioritize funding for scientific research that replaces funding cuts by the federal government in 2025.(6) To be eligible for funding, all research projects submitted for potential funding shall be reviewed and approved by an institutional review board that meets the requirements of applicable laws and regulations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 404. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) The director of commerce shall oversee the process of hiring the administrator and shall set the level of salaries, bonuses, and benefits for the administrator. The task of hiring and determining the salaries, bonuses, and benefits of additional personnel may be delegated by the director of commerce to the administrator, subject to approval and oversight by the director of commerce.(2) Not more than five percent of the moneys in the fund may be used for administrative costs of the institute. Administrative costs include, but are not limited to:(a) Salaries, bonuses, and benefits paid or incurred with respect to the hiring or retention of the administrator and other officers and administrative staff that work on behalf of the institute under the supervision of the administrator;(b) Legal and accounting fees and expenses; and(c) All costs associated with the establishment and operation of the institute including, but not limited to, office rent, overhead, information technology and data systems, office supplies and equipment, clerical services, utilities, telephone, travel, repairs and maintenance, program audits, and other general costs of operating the institute.(3) All intellectual property assets developed using funds authorized for, or made available to, the institute must be treated pursuant to state and federal law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 405. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) There is hereby established the Washington institute for scientific advancement research council, which shall:(a) Develop the strategic objectives and priorities of the institute;(b) Actively participate in the overall management of the institute; and(c) Determine which research projects will be funded by the institute account based on the research priorities established for the institute and the technical merits of the proposals, as determined by scientific peer review panels created pursuant to section 408 of this act.(2) The council consists of 11 members appointed by the director of commerce.(a) A majority of members of the council must be scientists, including at least one member who is an early career researcher, with current or past research experience in the fields described in section 403 of this act.(b) At least two members of the council must be members of the public.(c) At least one member of the council must be the president of the University of Washington, or the president's designee.(d) At least one member of the council must be the president of the Washington State University, or the president's designee.(3) Individuals and organizations may submit nominations for membership to the council, and the council may also solicit nominations from relevant organizations and individuals.(4) The term length for members appointed to the council pursuant to this section is four year. Members may not serve more than two terms.(5) When a term expires, the director of commerce shall appoint a member within 30 days. Members must serve until the member's replacement is appointed.(6) If a vacancy occurs within a term, the director of commerce shall appoint a replacement member within 30 days to serve the remainder of the term.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 406. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) Final grant awards must be determined by the full council.(2) The council must contain the proportional representation of appointees described in section 405 of this act when the council approves the funding of research grants.(3) Vacancies affecting the proportional representation must be filled before grants are approved.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 407. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:Councilmembers shall serve without compensation but may receive reimbursement for travel and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 408. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) The council may establish one or more scientific peer review panels consisting of experts in the fields described in section 403 of this act for the purposes of reviewing and prioritizing proposals on the basis of the professional record of the investigators, scientific merit of the proposal, and potential benefit to the health and well-being of the population, natural resources, and environment of the state.(2) An expert on a scientific peer review panel may not have a collaborative or commercial relationship with any applicant for a proposal for funding that the expert is asked to review or prioritize.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 409. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:Beginning December 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the institute shall submit an annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that sets forth the institute's activities, grants awarded, grants in progress, research accomplishments, and future program directions. Each annual report must include, but not be limited to, the following: The number and dollar amounts of research and facilities grants; the grantees for the prior year; the institute's administrative expenses; an assessment of the availability of funding for research from sources other than the institute; a summary of research findings, including promising new research areas; an assessment of the relationship between the institute's grants and the overall strategy of its research program; and a report of the institute's strategic research and financial plans.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 410. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) The open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, applies to all meetings of the institute, except as otherwise provided in this section. The institute shall disclose all awarded grants in public meetings; award all grants and contracts in public meetings; and adopt all governance, scientific, medical, and regulatory standards in public meetings.(2) The institute may conduct closed sessions as permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW.Sec. 411. RCW 42.30.110 and 2024 c 277 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to prevent a governing body from holding an executive session during a regular or special meeting:(a)(i) To consider matters affecting national security;(ii) To consider, if in compliance with any required data security breach disclosure under RCW 19.255.010 and 42.56.590, and with legal counsel available, information regarding the infrastructure and security of computer and telecommunications networks, security and service recovery plans, security risk assessments and security test results to the extent that they identify specific system vulnerabilities, and other information that if made public may increase the risk to the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of agency security or to information technology infrastructure or assets;(b) To consider the selection of a site or the acquisition of real estate by lease or purchase when public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of increased price;(c) To consider the minimum price at which real estate will be offered for sale or lease when public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of decreased price. However, final action selling or leasing public property shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;(d) To review negotiations on the performance of publicly bid contracts when public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of increased costs;(e) To consider, in the case of an export trading company, financial and commercial information supplied by private persons to the export trading company;(f) To receive and evaluate complaints or charges brought against a public officer or employee. However, upon the request of such officer or employee, a public hearing or a meeting open to the public shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;(g) To evaluate the qualifications of an applicant for public employment or to review the performance of a public employee. However, subject to RCW 42.30.140(4), discussion by a governing body of salaries, wages, and other conditions of employment to be generally applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting open to the public, and when a governing body elects to take final action hiring, setting the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;(h) To evaluate the qualifications of a candidate for appointment to elective office. However, any interview of such candidate and final action appointing a candidate to elective office shall be in a meeting open to the public;(i) To discuss with legal counsel representing the agency matters relating to agency enforcement actions, or to discuss with legal counsel representing the agency litigation or potential litigation to which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public knowledge regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or financial consequence to the agency.This subsection (1)(i) does not permit a governing body to hold an executive session solely because an attorney representing the agency is present. For purposes of this subsection (1)(i), "potential litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or RCW 5.60.060(2)(a) concerning:(i) Litigation that has been specifically threatened to which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity is, or is likely to become, a party;(ii) Litigation that the agency reasonably believes may be commenced by or against the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity; or(iii) Litigation or legal risks of a proposed action or current practice that the agency has identified when public discussion of the litigation or legal risks is likely to result in an adverse legal or financial consequence to the agency;(j) To consider, in the case of the state library commission or its advisory bodies, western library network prices, products, equipment, and services, when such discussion would be likely to adversely affect the network's ability to conduct business in a competitive economic climate. However, final action on these matters shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;(k) To consider, in the case of the state investment board, financial and commercial information when the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when public knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers of this information;(l) To consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished information related to the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care services as provided in RCW 41.05.026;(m) To consider in the case of the life sciences discovery fund authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this information;(n) To consider in the case of a health sciences and services authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this information;(o) To consider information regarding staff privileges or quality improvement committees under RCW 70.41.205;(p) To consider proprietary or confidential data collected or analyzed pursuant to chapter 70.405 RCW;(q) To consider greenhouse gas allowance auction bidding information that is prohibited from release or disclosure under RCW 70A.65.100(8);(r) To consider matters involving information relating to patients or medical or scientific research subjects, the disclosure of which would constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;(s) To consider matters involving a confidential intellectual property or work product, whether patentable or not, including, but not limited to, any formula, plan, pattern, process, tool, mechanism, compound, procedure, production data, or compilation of information, which is not patented, which is known only to certain individuals who are using it to fabricate, produce, or compound an article of trade or a service having commercial value, and which gives its user an opportunity to obtain a business advantage over competitors who do not know it or use it;(t) To consider matters involving scientific data, analyses, or other research products not yet formally published in academic literature;(u) To consider matters concerning the appointment, employment, performance, compensation, or dismissal of Washington institute for scientific advancement officers and employees. Action on compensation of Washington institute for scientific advancement officers and employees may only be taken in open session;(v) To consider matters believed to pose a security risk to the people of Washington.(2) Before convening in executive session, the presiding officer of a governing body shall publicly announce the purpose for excluding the public from the meeting place, and the time when the executive session will be concluded. The executive session may be extended to a stated later time by announcement of the presiding officer. The announced purpose of excluding the public must be entered into the minutes of the meeting required by RCW 42.30.035.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 412. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:Materials submitted to the Washington institute for scientific advancement as grant applications and all materials used in the review of grant applications or pertaining to grant applications are confidential and are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.PART VCONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY CLAUSESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 501. This act must be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 502. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.PART VIREFERENDUM PROVISIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 601. (1) The secretary of state shall submit sections 401 through 412 of this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with Article II, section 1, and Article VIII, section 3, of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate their operation.(2) If the people ratify this act as specified under subsection (1) of this section, revenues generated must be spent as detailed in this act.(3) Pursuant to RCWÂ  29A.72.050(7), the statement of subject and concise description for the ballot title shall read: "The legislature has passed Bill No. . . . (this act), concerning the funding of scientific research in the state of Washington. This bill would authorize the state to issue $6,000,000,000 in general obligation bonds between 2025 and 2031, the proceeds of which would be granted through a process administered by the Washington institute for scientific advancement and the department of commerce to fund scientific research within the state of Washington."(4) If this measure is approved by the voters but superseded in whole or in part by a conflicting measure approved by the voters at the same election, and the conflicting measure is later held to be invalid, this measure shall be self-executing and given full force and effect.--- END ---